Florida, session 2026, SB1732.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 790.402, Florida Statutes, is created to 17 read: 18 790.402âBlood testing required following civilian-involved 19 shootings.â 20 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 21 (a)ââCivilianâ means an individual who is not acting in an 22 official capacity as a law enforcement officer, correctional 23 officer, correctional probation officer, as those terms are 24 defined in s. 943.10, or member of the armed forces at the time 25 of the incident. 26 (b)ââCivilian-involved shootingâ means an incident within 27 this state in which a civilian discharges a firearm, whether 28 intentionally or unintentionally, resulting in injury or death 29 to any person. 30 (2)âTESTING REQUIREMENT.âIf a civilian discharges a firearm 31 within this state resulting in an injury or a death, such 32 individual must submit to a test of his or her blood within 2 33 hours after the incident for the purpose of determining the 34 alcohol content thereof or the presence of chemical substances 35 as set forth in s. 877.111 or any substance controlled under 36 chapter 893. 37 (3)âPROCEDURE.â 38 (a)âThe test must be administered by a qualified medical 39 professional at the direction of a law enforcement officer or an 40 independent investigator assigned by the Department of Law 41 Enforcement. 42 (b)âThe blood sample must be analyzed by a state-certified 43 laboratory, and the results must be provided to the 44 investigating agency and to the Department of Law Enforcement. 45 (c)âRefusal to submit to testing pursuant to this section 46 constitutes grounds for administrative or criminal penalties, 47 and such refusal is deemed a waiver of a claim of self-defense 48 in any subsequent criminal or civil proceedings arising from the 49 incident. 50 (4)âCONFIDENTIALITY AND DISCLOSURE.âTest results obtained 51 pursuant to this section must be treated as part of the official 52 investigative record and maintained in accordance with chapter 53 119. Results may be disclosed upon conclusion of the 54 investigation unless otherwise prohibited by law or court order. 55 (5)âREPORTING.âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall 56 submit an annual report by June 30 of each year to the Governor, 57 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 58 Representatives which includes all of the following information: 59 (a)âThe number of civilian-involved shooting incidents and 60 the number of those individuals that submitted to the required 61 testing pursuant to this section. 62 (b)âAggregate data on testing results and any related 63 prosecutorial or disciplinary actions. 64 (c)âRecommendations for policy or procedural improvements 65 to enhance firearm safety, transparency, and community 66 accountability. 67 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.